src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

LEXICON Numerals
zero num ; !zero
unu num ; !one
doi num ; !two
trei num ; !three
patru num ; !four
cinci num ; !five
şase num ; !six
şapte num ; !seven
opt num ; !eight
nouă num ; !nine
zece num ; !ten

LEXICON num
+Num: # ;
